District of Columbia statutes.
47-2731

Repealed

Findings.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-242, § 2, 42 DCR 86
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11702(a)(1)
1981 Ed., § 47-2731.
Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11721, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, provided: “Sec. 11721. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.”
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 12 of D.C. Law 10-242 provided that pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor is authorized to issue any rules that may be necessary to implement the provisions of the act. Additionally Council requested that the Mayor amend the District of Columbia State Implementation Plan to ensure that the District receives credit for reductions in volatile organic compounds and nitrogen oxides, in fulfillment of the District’s federally mandated requirement to reduce ozone creating pollutants.